Hawaii statutes.
PART
VIII. MISSING CHILD CENTER-HAWAII

Note

Part heading amended by L 2005, c 32, §1(1).

§28-121 Missing child center-Hawaii;
programs. (a) There is established within the department of the attorney
general a program to be known as the missing child center-Hawaii, formerly
known as the Hawaii state clearinghouse for missing children, to assist in the
implementation of federal and state laws relating to missing children.

(b) The missing child center-Hawaii shall
include programs to coordinate the efforts of state and county agencies with
those of federal agencies in locating, recovering, and protecting missing
children and to promote community awareness of the problem of missing children.

(c) The department of the attorney general
shall employ, without regard to chapter 76, a coordinator and an assistant to
the coordinator who shall coordinate existing public and private resources and
further define and develop, to the extent of available resources, the most
appropriate system for addressing the problem of missing children, which may
include the following:

(1) A communication network among county and state
law enforcement agencies and the National Crime Information Center in
Washington, D.C.;

(2) A standardized reporting system in all counties developed
in conjunction with law enforcement officials at all levels;

(3) Assistance in the establishment of trained search
teams that can be activated in each county;

(4) Educational programs designed to prevent child
abduction, enhance child safety, and raise public awareness about ways to
prevent child abduction, molestation, and sexual exploitation;

(5) A directory of resources to assist in locating
missing children including names, addresses, and services provided by public
and private organizations; and

(6) A statewide centralized, uniform, and
computerized information database relating to family-related and
nonfamily-related child abductions, as well as runaways and children who are
unwanted by their parents. [L 1997, c 259, pt of §2; am L 2000, c 253, §150; am
L 2005, c 32, §1(2)]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next